src/third_party/mozjs/extract/intl/locales/gl/hyphenation/hyph_gl.dic
.su3b2i3ri2a3d2es.
.subiria1de
.su3b2i3r2í2a3d2es.
.subiría1de
.su3b2i3r2í2an.
.su3ba.
.su3b2as.
.su3b2a3m2os.
.suba1mo
.su3b2a3d2es.
.suba1de
.su3b2an.
.su3b2i3se.
.subi1se
.su3b2i3s2es.
.su3b2í3s2e3m2os.
.subí1se
.subíse1mo
.su3b2í3s2e3d2es.
.subíse1de
.su3b2i3s2en.
.su3b2i3de.
.su3b2í3deo.
.subí1de
.su3b2í3de2os.
.su3b2í3dea.
.su3b2í3de3as.
.su3b2a3dor.
.suba1do
.su3b2a3dora.
.subado1ra
.su3b2a3dor2es.
.subado1re
.su3bador2as.
.supe3r2ar.
.supe2r1a2
.su1pe
.supe3r2ando.
.superan1do
.supe3r2a3do.
.supera1do
.supe3r2a3da.
.supera1da
.supe3r2a3d2os.
.supe3r2a3d2as.
.supe3r2a3r2es.
.supera1re
.supe3r2arm2os.
.superar1mo
.supe3r2ard2es.
.superar1de
.supe3r2a3r2en.
.supe3ra.
.supe3r2as.
.supe3r2a3m2os.
.supera1mo
.supe3r2a3d2es.
.supera1de
.supe3r2an.
.supe3r2a3ba.
.supera1ba
.supe3r2a3b2as.
.supe3r2a3b2a3m2os.
.superaba1mo
.supe3r2á3b2a3m2os.
.supe2r1á2
.superá1ba
.superába1mo
.supe3r2a3b2a3d2es.
.superaba1de
.supe3r2á3b2a3d2es.
.superába1de
.supe3r2a3b2an.
.sup2e3r2ei.
.supe2r1e2
.supe3r2a3ch2es.
.supera1c2h
.superac1he
.supe3r2ou.
.supe2r1o2
.supe3r2ast2es.
.superas1te
.supe3r2a3ron.
.supera1ro
.supe3r2a3r2ei.
.supe3r2a3rás.
.supera1rá
.supe3r2a3rá.
.supe3r2e3r2e3m2os.
.supe1re1re
.superere1mo
.supe3r2e3r2e3d2es.
.superere1de
.supe3r2a3rán.
.supe3r2a3r2ía.
.supera1rí
.supe3r2a3r2í2as.
.supe3r2a3ri2a3m2os.
.supera1ri
.superaria1mo
.supe3r2a3r2í2a3m2os.
.superaría1mo
.supe3r2a3ri2a3d2es.
.superaria1de
.supe3r2a3r2í2a3d2es.
.superaría1de
.supe3r2a3r2í2an.
.supe3re.
.sup2e3r2es.
.sup2e3r2e3m2os.
.supere1mo
.sup2e3r2e3d2es.
.supere1de
.sup2e3r2en.
.supe3r2a3se.
.supera1se
.supe3r2a3s2es.
.supe3r2á3s2e3m2os.
.superá1se
.superáse1mo
.supe3r2á3s2e3d2es.
.superáse1de
.supe3r2a3s2en.
.supe3r2a3de.
.supe3r2á3deo.
.superá1de
.supe3r2á3de2os.
.supe3r2á3dea.
.supe3r2á3de3as.
.supe3r2a3dor.
.supe3r2a3dora.
.supe1rado1ra
.supe3r2a3dor2es.
.superado1re
.supe3rador2as.
.supe3ración.
.supera1ci
supe3r2ior
supe3r2a3b1le
supera1b2l
supe3r2a3bilida1de
supera1bi
superabi1li
superabili1da
a3er.
a3endo.
aen1do
a3e3r2es.
ae1re
a3erm2os.
aer1mo
a3erd2es.
aer1de
a3e3r2en.
a3erme.
aer1me
a3erte.
aer1te
a3erlle.
aer1l4l
aerl1le
a3ern2os.
aer1no
a3erv2os.
aer1vo
a3erll2es.
a3e3lo.
ae1lo
a3e3l2os.
a3e3la.
ae1la
a3e3l2as.
a3e3de.
ae1de
a3é3deo.
aé1de
a3é3dea.
a3é3de2os.
a3é3de3as.
a3e3m2os.
ae1mo
a3e3d2es.
a3eron.
a3e3se.
ae1se
a3e3s2es.
a3e3s2e3m2os.
aese1mo
a3é3s2e3m2os.
aé1se
aése1mo
a3e3s2e3d2es.
aese1de
a3é3s2e3d2es.
aése1de
a3e3s2en.
